Maryland, session 2025, HB0669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–926.
(A) A RECORDING OF A BODY–WORN CAMERA OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER MAY BE USED IN ANY ADMINISTRATIVE, JUDICIAL, LEGISLATIVE, OR
DISCIPLINARY PROCEEDING.
(B) IF A COURT OR OTHER FINDER OF FACT FINDS BY A PREPONDERANCE
OF THE EVIDENCE THAT A RECORDING WAS INTENTIONALLY NOT CAPTURED,
DESTROYED, ALTERED, OR INTERMITTENTLY CAPTURED IN VIOLATION OF THE
BODY–WORN CAMERA REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 3–511 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY
ARTICLE, THEN THE COURT OR OTHER FINDER OF FACT SHALL CONSIDER OR BE
INSTRUCTED TO CONSIDER THAT VIOLATION IN WEIGHING THE EVIDENCE, UNLESS
THE STATE PROVIDES A REASONABLE JUSTIFICATION FOR THE VIOLATION.
Article – General Provisions
4–315.1.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A CUSTODIAN SHALL
DENY INSPECTION OF A RECORDING MADE WITH THE USE OF A BODY–WORN CAMERA
OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER.
(B) A CUSTODIAN SHALL ALLOW INSPECTION OF A RECORDING MADE WITH
THE USE OF A BODY–WORN CAMERA OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER:
(1) IF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OBTAINS WRITTEN
PERMISSION TO DISCLOSE THE RECORDING FROM EACH INDIVIDUAL CAPTURED ON
THE RECORDING OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE;
(2) IF THE RECORDING IS FLAGGED ACCORDING TO § 3–511(C)(10)(I),
(II), (III), OR (IV) OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE, EXCEPT IF AN INDIVIDUAL
CAPTURED ON THE RECORDING WHO WAS NOT ARRESTED AS A RESULT OF THE
RECORDED ENCOUNTER:
(I) HAS A REASONABLE EXPECTATION OF PRIVACY IN WHAT
WAS RECORDED; OR

HOUSE BILL 669 3
(II) IS A VICTIM OF OR WITNESS TO A CRIME;
(3) BY AN INDIVIDUAL CAPTURED ON THE RECORDING OR THE
INDIVIDUAL’S ATTORNEY; OR
(4) BY THE RECORDING LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR THE
OFFICER’S ATTORNEY.
(C) A RECORDING REQUESTED FOR INSPECTION UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE REDACTED TO REMOVE IDENTIFICATION OF ANY INDIVIDUAL APPEARING
ON THE RECORDING WHO IS NOT:
(1) THE RECORDING OFFICER;
(2) THE SUBJECT OF THE RECORDED ENCOUNTER; OR
(3) DIRECTLY INVOLVED IN THE RECORDED ENCOUNTER.
Article – Public Safety
3–511.
(a) (1) In this section[, “law] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) (I) “COMMUNITY CARETAKING FUNCTION” MEANS A TASK
UNDERTAKEN BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IN WHICH THE OFFICER IS
PERFORMING AN ACT UNRELATED TO THE INVESTIGATION OF A CRIME.
(II) “COMMUNITY CARETAKING FUNCTION” INCLUDES
PARTICIPATING IN TOWN HALLS OR OTHER COMMUNITY OUTREACH, HELPING A
CHILD FIND THE CHILD’S PARENTS, PROVIDING DEATH NOTIFICATIONS, AND
PERFORMING IN–HOME OR HOSPITAL WELL–BEING CHECKS ON THE SICK, THE
ELDERLY, OR INDIVIDUALS PRESUMED MISSING.
(3) “LAW enforcement agency” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of this
title.
(b) On or before January 1, 2016, the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission shall develop and publish online a policy for the issuance and use of a
body–worn camera by a law enforcement officer that addresses:
(1) the testing of body–worn cameras to ensure adequate functioning;

HOUSE BILL 669
(2) the procedure for the law enforcement officer to follow if the camera
fails to properly operate at the beginning of or during the law enforcement officer’s shift;
(3) when recording is mandatory;
(4) when recording is prohibited;
(5) when recording is discretionary;
(6) when recording may require consent of a subject being recorded;
(7) when a recording may be ended;
(8) providing notice of recording;
(9) access to and confidentiality of recordings;
(10) the secure storage of data from a body–worn camera;
(11) review and use of recordings;
(12) retention of recordings;
(13) dissemination and release of recordings;
(14) consequences for violations of the agency’s body–worn camera policy;
(15) notification requirements when another individual becomes a party to
the communication following the initial notification;
(16) specific protections for individuals when there is an expectation of
privacy in private or public places; and
(17) any additional issues determined to be relevant in the implementation
and use of body–worn cameras by law enforcement officers.
(c) (1) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE AND BE CONSISTENT WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS AND GUIDELINES CONTAINED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) UNLESS PURCHASED AND ACQUIRED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2015, A BODY–WORN CAMERA SHALL BE:
(I) EQUIPPED WITH PRE–EVENT RECORDING, CAPABLE OF
RECORDING AT LEAST THE 30 SECONDS PRIOR TO CAMERA ACTIVATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 669 5
(II) CAPABLE OF RECORDING FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 10
HOURS.
(3) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL TURN ON THE OFFICER’S
BODY–WORN CAMERA WHEN THE OFFICER IS IN UNIFORM AND IS RESPONDING TO
CALLS FOR SERVICE OR ENGAGED IN A LAW ENFORCEMENT–RELATED ACTIVITY
THAT OCCURS WHILE THE OFFICER IS ON DUTY UNLESS:
(I) EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES PREVENT THE CAMERA FROM
BEING TURNED ON IMMEDIATELY;
(II) THE OFFICER IS INSIDE A PATROL CAR THAT IS EQUIPPED
WITH A FUNCTIONING IN–CAR CAMERA; OR
(III) THE OFFICER IS INSIDE A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR
COURTHOUSE THAT IS EQUIPPED WITH A FUNCTIONING CAMERA SYSTEM.
(4) (I) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL TURN OFF THE OFFICER’S
BODY–WORN CAMERA WHEN:
A. A VICTIM OR WITNESS OF A CRIME REQUESTS THAT
THE BODY–WORN CAMERA BE TURNED OFF;
B. THE OFFICER IS INTERACTING WITH A CONFIDENTIAL
INFORMANT USED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY; OR
C. A FIELD ENFORCEMENT AGENT OF THE
COMPTROLLER OF MARYLAND ENTERS A COMPTROLLER FACILITY OR CONDUCTS
AN INTERVIEW DURING WHICH RETURN INFORMATION WILL BE DISCUSSED OR
VISIBLE.
2. UNLESS IMPRACTICAL OR IMPOSSIBLE, A REQUEST
OF A VICTIM OR WITNESS THAT A BODY–WORN CAMERA BE TURNED OFF UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1A OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL BE MADE ON THE
RECORDING.
(II) 1. NOTWITHSTANDING SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AN OFFICER MAY CONTINUE TO RECORD A VICTIM, WITNESS, OR
CONFIDENTIAL INFORMANT IF:
A. EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES EXIST; OR

HOUSE BILL 669
B. THE OFFICER HAS REASONABLE, ARTICULABLE
SUSPICION THAT THE VICTIM, WITNESS, OR INFORMANT HAS COMMITTED OR IS IN
THE PROCESS OF COMMITTING A CRIME.
2. UNLESS IMPRACTICAL OR IMPOSSIBLE, THE OFFICER
SHALL INDICATE ON THE RECORDING THE REASON FOR CONTINUING TO RECORD
UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
(5) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MAY TURN OFF THE OFFICER’S
BODY–WORN CAMERA WHEN THE OFFICER IS ENGAGED IN A COMMUNITY
CARETAKING FUNCTION, UNLESS THE OFFICER HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT THE
PERSON ON WHOSE BEHALF THE OFFICER IS PERFORMING A COMMUNITY
CARETAKING FUNCTION HAS COMMITTED OR IS IN THE PROCESS OF COMMITTING A
CRIME.
(6) (I) IF A PERSON HAS A REASONABLE EXPECTATION OF
PRIVACY, A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL NOTIFY THE PERSON THAT THE
OFFICER IS RECORDING IN A MANNER THAT IS EVIDENT IN THE RECORDING.
(II) IF EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES EXIST THAT PREVENT THE
OFFICER FROM PROVIDING NOTICE, NOTICE MUST BE PROVIDED AS SOON AS
PRACTICABLE.
(7) (I) ONLY PERSONNEL RESPONSIBLE FOR REDACTING OR
DUPLICATING RECORDINGS MAY ACCESS A BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDING TO
REDACT OR DUPLICATE THE RECORDING.
(II) NEITHER A RECORDING OFFICER NOR THE OFFICER’S
SUPERVISOR MAY REDACT, DUPLICATE, OR OTHERWISE ALTER THE RECORDING
OFFICER’S BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDINGS.
(8) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
RECORDING OFFICER AND THE OFFICER’S SUPERVISOR MAY ACCESS AND REVIEW A
BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDING BEFORE COMPLETING AN INCIDENT REPORT OR
OTHER DOCUMENTATION ONLY IF THE SUPERVISOR DISCLOSES THE ACCESS AND
REVIEW IN THE INCIDENT REPORT OR OTHER DOCUMENTATION.
(II) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MAY NOT HAVE ACCESS TO,
OR REVIEW, A BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDING OF THE OFFICER OR ANOTHER
OFFICER BEFORE COMPLETING AN INCIDENT REPORT OR OTHER DOCUMENTATION
IF THE OFFICER:

HOUSE BILL 669 7
1. HAS BEEN INVOLVED IN, OR IS A WITNESS TO, AN
OFFICER–INVOLVED SHOOTING, USE OF DEADLY FORCE INCIDENT, OR USE OF
FORCE INCIDENT RESULTING IN GREAT BODILY HARM; OR
2. IS ORDERED TO WRITE A REPORT IN RESPONSE TO, OR
DURING THE INVESTIGATION OF, A MISCONDUCT COMPLAINT AGAINST THE
OFFICER.
(III) 1. A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER DESCRIBED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY FILE AN AMENDATORY REPORT TO
THE INCIDENT REPORT AFTER VIEWING ONE OR MORE BODY–WORN CAMERA
RECORDINGS.
2. AN AMENDATORY REPORT FILED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE DOCUMENTATION
REGARDING ACCESS TO THE RECORDING OR RECORDINGS.
(9) (I) A RECORDING OFFICER’S ASSIGNED FIELD TRAINING
OFFICER MAY ACCESS AND REVIEW BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDINGS FOR
TRAINING PURPOSES.
(II) A DETECTIVE OR INVESTIGATOR DIRECTLY INVOLVED IN AN
INVESTIGATION MAY ACCESS AND REVIEW BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDINGS THAT
PERTAIN TO THE INVESTIGATION BUT MAY NOT DELETE OR ALTER SUCH
RECORDINGS.
(10) A BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDING SHALL BE RETAINED BY THE
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR BY THE CAMERA VENDOR USED BY THE AGENCY
FOR 90 DAYS AFTER THE RECORDING IS MADE AND DESTROYED THEREAFTER
UNLESS THE RECORDING IS FLAGGED BECAUSE:
(I) A FORMAL OR INFORMAL COMPLAINT HAS BEEN FILED
REGARDING AN ENCOUNTER CAPTURED ON THE RECORDING;
(II) THE RECORDING OFFICER DISCHARGED THE OFFICER’S
FIREARM OR USED FORCE DURING THE RECORDED ENCOUNTER;
(III) A PERSON CAPTURED IN THE RECORDING DIED OR
SUFFERED GREAT BODILY HARM;
(IV) THE RECORDED ENCOUNTER RESULTED IN A DETENTION
OR AN ARREST, EXCLUDING TRAFFIC STOPS THAT RESULTED IN ONLY AN OFFENSE
PUNISHABLE BY A FINE;

HOUSE BILL 669
(V) THE OFFICER IS THE SUBJECT OF AN INTERNAL
INVESTIGATION OR OTHER MISCONDUCT INVESTIGATION;
(VI) THE SUPERVISOR OF THE RECORDING OFFICER, A
PROSECUTOR, A DEFENDANT, OR THE COURT DETERMINES THAT THE ENCOUNTER
HAS EVIDENTIARY VALUE IN A CRIMINAL PROSECUTION; OR
(VII) THE RECORDING OFFICER REQUESTS THAT THE
RECORDING BE SAVED:
1. FOR PURPOSES RELATED TO THE OFFICER’S OFFICIAL
DUTIES; OR
2. BECAUSE THE OFFICER BELIEVES IT MAY HAVE
EVIDENTIARY VALUE IN A CRIMINAL PROSECUTION.
(11) (I) A BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDING OF A LAW
ENFORCEMENT–RELATED ACTIVITY MAY NOT BE ALTERED, ERASED, OR DESTROYED
BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF THE 90–DAY STORAGE PERIOD SPECIFIED IN
PARAGRAPH (10) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF A RECORDING IS ALTERED, ERASED, OR DESTROYED BEFORE THE
EXPIRATION OF THE 90–DAY STORAGE PERIOD SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (10) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL MAINTAIN, FOR 1 YEAR,
A WRITTEN RECORD OF THE ACTION INCLUDING THE NAME OF THE INDIVIDUAL WHO
MADE THE ALTERATION, ERASURE, OR DESTRUCTION AND THE REASON FOR THE
ALTERATION, ERASURE, OR DESTRUCTION.
(12) A FLAGGED RECORDING UNDER PARAGRAPH (10) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE ALTERED OR DESTROYED:
(I) FOR 2 YEARS AFTER THE RECORDING IS FLAGGED; OR
(II) IF THE RECORDING IS USED IN A CRIMINAL, CIVIL, OR
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING, UNTIL AFTER A FINAL DISPOSITION AND ORDER
FROM THE COURT.
(13) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY LABEL A BODY–WORN
CAMERA RECORDING WITHIN THE RECORDING MEDIUM IF THE LABELING DOES NOT
ALTER THE ACTUAL RECORDING OF THE INCIDENT CAPTURED ON THE BODY–WORN
BODY CAMERA.

HOUSE BILL 669 9
(14) (I) A RECORDING MAY BE RETAINED BEYOND THE STORAGE
REQUIREMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS SUBSECTION IF A SUPERVISOR AT THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY DESIGNATES THE RECORDING FOR TRAINING PURPOSES.
(II) A RECORDING DESIGNATED FOR TRAINING PURPOSES
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY BE VIEWED BY AN OFFICER, IN
THE PRESENCE OF A SUPERVISOR OR TRAINING INSTRUCTOR, FOR THE PURPOSES
OF INSTRUCTION, TRAINING, OR ENSURING COMPLIANCE WITH AGENCY POLICIES.
(15) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
BODY–WORN CAMERA RECORDING MAY NOT BE USED TO DISCIPLINE A LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER UNLESS:
1. A FORMAL OR INFORMAL COMPLAINT OF
MISCONDUCT HAS BEEN MADE;
2. A USE OF FORCE INCIDENT HAS OCCURRED;
3. THE ENCOUNTER ON THE RECORDING COULD RESULT
IN AN INTERNAL INVESTIGATION UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE; OR
4. THE RECORDING IS USED FOR CORROBORATION OF
OTHER EVIDENCE OF MISCONDUCT.
(II) NOTHING IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
LIMITS OR PROHIBITS A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER FROM BEING SUBJECT TO AN
ACTION THAT DOES NOT AMOUNT TO DISCIPLINE.
(16) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL ENSURE PROPER CARE AND
MAINTENANCE OF A BODY–WORN CAMERA, INCLUDING:
(I) REQUIRING AN OFFICER TO DOCUMENT AND NOTIFY THE
APPROPRIATE SUPERVISOR OF TECHNICAL DIFFICULTIES, FAILURES, OR
PROBLEMS WITH A BODY–WORN CAMERA OR ASSOCIATED EQUIPMENT ON
BECOMING AWARE OF THE ISSUE; AND
(II) REQUIRING A SUPERVISOR, ON RECEIVING NOTICE OF A
PROBLEM WITH BODY–WORN CAMERA EQUIPMENT, TO MAKE EVERY REASONABLE
EFFORT TO CORRECT AND REPAIR THE EQUIPMENT.
(17) (I) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MAY NOT HINDER OR
PROHIBIT A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC FROM RECORDING A LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE OFFICER’S DUTIES IN A PUBLIC PLACE OR
WHEN THE OFFICER HAS NO REASONABLE EXPECTATION OF PRIVACY.

HOUSE BILL 669
(II) A WRITTEN POLICY CREATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION SHALL INDICATE:
1. THE POTENTIAL CRIMINAL PENALTIES AND
ADMINISTRATIVE DISCIPLINE FOR UNLAWFUL CONFISCATION OR DESTRUCTION OF
THE RECORDING MEDIUM OF A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC; AND
2. THAT AN OFFICER MAY TAKE REASONABLE ACTION TO
MAINTAIN SAFETY AND CONTROL, SECURE CRIME SCENES AND ACCIDENT SITES,
PROTECT THE INTEGRITY AND CONFIDENTIALITY OF INVESTIGATIONS, AND
PROTECT THE PUBLIC SAFETY AND ORDER.
(D) (1) (i) This paragraph applies to:
1. the Department of State Police;
2. the Anne Arundel County Police Department;
3. the Howard County Police Department; and
4. the Harford County Sheriff’s Office.
(ii) On or before July 1, 2023, a law enforcement agency to which this
paragraph applies shall require the use of body–worn cameras, subject to the policy on the
use of body–worn cameras developed by the law enforcement agency, by each law
enforcement officer employed by the law enforcement agency who regularly interacts with
members of the public as part of the law enforcement officer’s official duties.
(2) On or before July 1, 2025, a law enforcement agency of a county, other
than a law enforcement agency described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall require
the use of body–worn cameras, subject to the policy on the use of body–worn cameras
developed by the law enforcement agency, by each law enforcement officer employed by the
law enforcement agency who regularly interacts with members of the public as part of the
law enforcement officer’s official duties.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY
IN THE STATE SHALL REQUIRE THE USE OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS, SUBJECT TO THE
POLICY ON THE USE OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS DEVELOPED BY THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, BY EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER EMPLOYED BY THE
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WHO REGULARLY INTERACTS WITH MEMBERS OF THE
PUBLIC AS PART OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER’S OFFICIAL DUTIES.
[(d)] (E) (1) A law enforcement agency described in subsection [(c)] (D) of this
section shall develop and maintain a written policy consistent with the policy published by

HOUSE BILL 669 11
the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission under subsection (b) of this
section for the use of body–worn cameras.
(2) A policy developed and maintained under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall specify which law enforcement officers employed by the law enforcement
agency are required to use body–worn cameras.
[(e) A body–worn camera that possesses the requisite technological capability
shall automatically record and save at least 60 seconds of video footage immediately prior
to the officer activating the record button on the device.]
(f) A law enforcement agency may not negate or alter any of the requirements or
policies established in accordance with this section through collective bargaining.
(G) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY REQUIRED TO USE BODY–WORN
CAMERAS UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
COMMISSION A REPORT ON THE USE OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A BRIEF OVERVIEW OF THE MAKEUP OF THE AGENCY,
INCLUDING THE NUMBER OF OFFICERS UTILIZING BODY–WORN CAMERAS;
(II) THE NUMBER OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS UTILIZED BY THE
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
(III) ANY TECHNICAL ISSUES WITH THE BODY–WORN CAMERA
EQUIPMENT AND HOW THOSE ISSUES WERE REMEDIED;
(IV) A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE REVIEW PROCESS USED BY
SUPERVISORS WITHIN THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY; AND
(V) ANY OTHER INFORMATION RELEVANT TO THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EACH JANUARY 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON THE INFORMATION COLLECTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.